Utah statutes.
48-2c-114 (Repealed 07/01/13).   Scope of inspection right.

(1)  An agent or attorney of a current or former member or manager has the same inspection and copying rights as the person represented by the agent or attorney.

(2)  The right to copy records under Section 48-2c-113 includes, if reasonable, the right to receive copies made by photographic, xerographic, electronic, or other means.

(3)  The company may impose a reasonable charge, payable in advance, to cover the costs of labor and material, for copies of any documents to be provided.  The charge may not exceed the estimated cost of production or reproduction of the records.



Enacted by Chapter 260, 2001 General Session 

Repealed by Chapter 353, 2011 General Session

